utilities/dictionaries/lv_LV-Latvian.aff
SFX 0 Y 104
SFX 0  t     ošs/W   [^begīklmprsūo]t
SFX 0  ēbt   ebjošs/W  [ē]bt
SFX 0  iet   ejošs/WYX  [^s]iet
SFX 0  t     nošs/W    [s]iet
SFX 0  gt    dzošs/W  [^ai]gt
SFX 0  agt   ogošs/W    [a]gt
SFX 0  gt    egošs/W   [mnrt]igt
SFX 0  gt    dzošs/W  [^mnrt]igt
SFX 0  īt    enošs/W  [^rvm]īt
SFX 0  īt    ijošs/W    [rvm]īt
SFX 0  kt    cošs/WYX [^ailru]kt
SFX 0  akt   okošs/W       akt
SFX 0  ukt   ūkošs/W   [^a]ukt
SFX 0  kt    cošs/W     [a]ukt
SFX 0  ilkt  elkošs/W   [i]lkt
SFX 0  kt    cošs/W    [^i]lkt
SFX 0  irkt  ērkošs/W   [i]rkt
SFX 0  kt    cošs/W    [^i]rkt
SFX 0  kt    cošs/W   [^lnt]ikt
SFX 0  kt    ekošs/WYX    [l]ikt
SFX 0  ikt   īkošs/WYX    [nt]ikt
SFX 0  lt    ļošs/W     lt
SFX 0  t     jošs/W     mt
SFX 0  pt    ošs/W  [^aiur]pt
SFX 0  apt   opošs/W    [a]pt
SFX 0  ipt   īpošs/W    [i]pt
SFX 0  upt   ūpošs/W    [u]pt
SFX 0  irpt  ērpošs/W  [i]rpt
SFX 0  ārt   arošs/W   [ā]rt
SFX 0  ērt   erošs/W   [ē]rt
SFX 0  irt   erdošs/W   [i]rt
SFX 0  ast   otošs/WYX    [a]st
SFX 0  st    došs/W  [^mi]est
SFX 0  st    žošs/W    [i]est
SFX 0  st    tošs/W    [m]est
SFX 0  st    došs/W     [ē]st
SFX 0  st    žošs/W   [īoū]st
SFX 0  ist   ītošs/W [^aģķsr]ist
SFX 0  st    žošs/W      [a]ist
SFX 0  st    edošs/WYX     [ģ]ist
SFX 0  st    etošs/W     [ķ]ist
SFX 0  st    tošs/W      [s]ist
SFX 0  ist   ītošs/WYX    [k]rist
SFX 0  st    enošs/W    [b]rist
SFX 0  irst  ērtošs/W  [i]rst
SFX 0  st    žošs/W    [ē]rst
SFX 0  st    žošs/W  [^jkzsš]ust
SFX 0  ust   ūtošs/WYX     [jsš]ust
SFX 0  ust   ūstošs/W    [k]ust
SFX 0  ust   ūdošs/W     [z]ust
SFX 0  ūt    ujošs/W     ūt
SFX 0  ot    odošs/W     ot
SFX 0  t     ams/W   [^begīklmprsūo]t
SFX 0  ēbt   ebjams/W  [ē]bt
SFX 0  iet   ejams/WYX   [^s]iet
SFX 0  t     nams/W    [s]iet
SFX 0  gt    dzams/W  [^ai]gt
SFX 0  agt   ogams/W  [a]gt
SFX 0  gt    egams/W  [mnrt]igt
SFX 0  gt    dzams/W  [^mnrt]igt
SFX 0  īt    enams/WYX   [^rvm]īt
SFX 0  īt    ijams/W   [rvm]īt
SFX 0  kt    cams/W   [^ailru]kt
SFX 0  akt   okams/W    akt
SFX 0  ukt   ūkams/W  [^a]ukt
SFX 0  kt    cams/W    [a]ukt
SFX 0  ilkt  elkams/WYX  [i]lkt
SFX 0  kt    cams/W   [^i]lkt
SFX 0  irkt  ērkams/WYX   [i]rkt
SFX 0  kt    cams/W    [^i]rkt
SFX 0  kt    cams/W  [^lnt]ikt
SFX 0  kt    ekams/W   [l]ikt
SFX 0  ikt   īkams/WYX   [nt]ikt
SFX 0  lt    ļams/W     lt
SFX 0  t     jams/W     mt
SFX 0  pt    ams/W    [^aiur]pt
SFX 0  apt   opams/W   [a]pt
SFX 0  ipt   īpams/W   [i]pt
SFX 0  upt   ūpams/W   [u]pt
SFX 0  irpt  ērpams/WYX [i]rpt
SFX 0  ārt   arams/W   [ā]rt
SFX 0  ērt   erams/W   [ē]rt
SFX 0  irt   erdams/W  [i]rt
SFX 0  ast   otams/WYX   [a]st
SFX 0  st    dams/W   [^mi]est
SFX 0  st    žams/W    [i]est
SFX 0  st    tams/W    [m]est
SFX 0  st    dams/W    [ē]st
SFX 0  st    žams/W    [īoū]st
SFX 0  ist   ītams/W   [^aģķsr]ist
SFX 0  st    žams/W    [a]ist
SFX 0  st    edams/WYX   [ģ]ist
SFX 0  st    etams/W   [ķ]ist
SFX 0  ist   ītams/WYX   [k]rist
SFX 0  st    enams/W   [b]rist
SFX 0  st    tams/W    [s]ist
SFX 0  irst  ērtams/WYX  [i]rst
SFX 0  st    žams/W    [ē]rst
SFX 0  st    žams/W    [^jzksš]ust
SFX 0  ust   ūstams/W  [k]ust
SFX 0  ust   ūdams/W   [z]ust
SFX 0  ust   ūtams/WYX   [jsš]ust
SFX 0  ūt    ujams/W     ūt
SFX 0  ot    odams/WYX   ot



SFX 1 Y 36
SFX 1  t   ošs/W   [^āēīeouūbkmpsz]t
SFX 1  t   jošs/WYX  [āēīouū]t
SFX 1  t   nošs/W  [i]et
SFX 1  t   ošs/W   [^ēi]kt
SFX 1  ēkt ecošs/W  [ē]kt
SFX 1  kt  ekošs/WYX  [i]kt
SFX 1  zt  žošs/W    zt
SFX 1  t   ošs/W   [^āeor]bt
SFX 1  t   jošs/W   [āeor]bt
SFX 1  t   ošs/WYX    [ņ]emt
SFX 1  t   jošs/W   [^e]pt
SFX 1  t   jošs/W  [^c]ept
SFX 1  t   ošs/W    [c]ept
SFX 1  st  šošs/W [^eiī]st
SFX 1  st  šošs/W  [^n]est
SFX 1  t   ošs/W    [n]est
SFX 1  st  estošs/W  [i]st
SFX 1  īst ienošs/W  [ī]st
SFX 1  t   ams/W   [^āēīeouūbkmpsz]t
SFX 1  t   jams/WYX  [āēīouū]t
SFX 1  t   nams/W    [i]et
SFX 1  t   ams/W   [^ēi]kt
SFX 1  ēkt ecams/W   [ē]kt
SFX 1  kt  ekams/WYX [i]kt
SFX 1  zt  žams/W     zt
SFX 1  t   ams/W  [^āeor]bt
SFX 1  t   jams/W  [āeor]bt
SFX 1  t   ams/WYX  [ņ]emt
SFX 1  t   jams/W   [^e]pt
SFX 1  t   jams/W  [^c]ept
SFX 1  t   ams/W    [c]ept
SFX 1  st  šams/W [^eiī]st
SFX 1  st  šams/WYX  [^n]est
SFX 1  t   ams/WYX    [n]est
SFX 1  st  estams/W  [i]st
SFX 1  īst ienams/W  [ī]st



SFX 2 Y 30
SFX 2  t    stošs/W [^āēīsz]t
SFX 2  āt   ošs/WYX   āt
SFX 2  ēt   ošs/WYX     [^c]ēt
SFX 2  ēt   ošs/WYX   [^āe]cēt
SFX 2  cēt  košs/WYX    [ā]cēt
SFX 2  ēt   ošs/WYX   [^t]ecēt
SFX 2  cēt  košs/WYX   [t]ecēt
SFX 2  īt   ošs/WYX     [^cz]īt
SFX 2  cīt  košs/WYX  [^āīr]cīt
SFX 2  īt   ošs/WYX    [āīr]cīt
SFX 2  īt   ošs/WYX   [^atd]zīt
SFX 2  dzīt gošs/WYX     [d]zīt
SFX 2  t    stošs/W   [at]zīt
SFX 2  0    ošs/W   [sz]t
SFX 2  t    stams/W [^āēīsz]t
SFX 2  t    ms/WYX    [^d]āt
SFX 2  āt   ams/WYX    [d]āt
SFX 2  ēt   ams/WYX     [^c]ēt
SFX 2  ēt   ams/WYX   [^āe]cēt
SFX 2  cēt  kams/WYX    [ā]cēt
SFX 2  ēt   ams/WYX   [^t]ecēt
SFX 2  cēt  kams/WYX   [t]ecēt
SFX 2  īt   āms/WYX    [^zc]īt
SFX 2  cīt  kāms/WYX [^āīr]cīt
SFX 2  īt   āms/WYX   [āīr]cīt
SFX 2  īt   āms/WYX  [^atd]zīt
SFX 2  īt   āms/WYX    [^d]zīt
SFX 2  dzīt gāms/WYX    [d]zīt
SFX 2  t    stams/W  [at]zīt
SFX 2  0    ams/W   [sz]t

SFX % Y 11
SFX %  t  stošs/W   [lz]īt
SFX %  t  stams/WXY [lz]īt
SFX %  t  stošies   [lz]īt
SFX %  ast odošs/WXY ast
SFX %  ast odams/WXY ast
SFX %  ast odošies    ast
SFX %  īt inošs/W   [mķprt]īt
SFX %  īt inams/WXY [mķprt]īt
SFX %  īt inošies    [mķprt]īt
SFX %  iet ejošs/WXY iet
SFX %  iet ejams/WXY iet

SFX 3 Y 4
SFX 3   t    dams    t
SFX 3   t    dama    t
SFX 3   t    dami    t
SFX 3   t    damas   t

SFX 4 Y 4
SFX 4   st   zdams   [s]t
SFX 4   st   zdama   [s]t
SFX 4   st   zdami   [s]t
SFX 4   st   zdamas  [s]t
